Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 5A. Polygraph Protection Act

§ 494.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Employer” means any individual, organization, or governmental body, including partnership, association, trustee, estate, corporation, joint stock company, insurance company, or legal representative, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee or successor thereof, and any common carrier by mail, motor, water, air, or express company doing business in or operating within this State, which has one or more individuals performing services for it within this State.

“Employee” means every person who may be permitted, required, or directed by any employer, in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit, to perform services.

“Prospective employee” means an individual seeking or being sought for employment with an employer.

“Employment agency” means a person who undertakes, with or without compensation, to procure, refer, recruit, or place for an employer or person, the opportunity to work for an employer.

“Examiner” means any person licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 53.

“Polygraph examination” means any procedure which involves the use of instrumentation or a mechanical device to enable or assist the detection of deception, the verification of the truthfulness, or the rendering of a diagnostic opinion regarding either of these, and includes a lie detector or similar test.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 89

.

§ 494a.
Polygraph testing as condition of employment.

Except as provided in section 494b of this title, an employer or an employment agency shall not as a condition of employment, promotion, or change in status of employment, or as an express or implied condition of a benefit or privilege of employment, do any of the following:

request or require that an employee or applicant for employment take or submit to a polygraph examination; or

administer, cause to be administered, threaten to administer, or attempt to administer a polygraph examination to an employee or applicant for employment; or

request or require that an employee or applicant for employment give an express or implied waiver of a practice prohibited under this subchapter.

An employer shall not refuse to hire, promote, or change the status of employment of an applicant for employment because the applicant refuses or declines a polygraph examination.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 89

.

§ 494b.
Employers permitted to require polygraph examinations.

The following employers may require that an applicant for employment take or submit to a polygraph examination, or administer or cause to be administered a polygraph examination to an applicant for employment:

the Department of Public Safety; the Department of Motor Vehicles, for applicants for law enforcement positions; the Department of Fish and Wildlife, for applicants for law enforcement positions; the Department of Liquor and Lottery and the Board of Liquor and Lottery, for applicants for investigator positions; municipal police departments and county sheriffs, as to sworn police officers and deputy sheriffs;

any employer whose primary business is the wholesale or retail sale of precious metals or gems and jewelry or items made from precious metals or gems;

any employer whose business includes the manufacture or the wholesale or retail sale of regulated drugs as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 4201

; provided, however, that only employees who come in contact with such regulated drugs may be required to take a polygraph examination;

any employer authorized or required under federal law or regulations to administer polygraph examinations.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 89

; amended

2001, No. 38

, § 1;

2009, No. 5

, § 1;

2019, No. 73

, § 35.

§ 494c.
Duties of examiner.

An examiner administering a polygraph examination under this subchapter shall:

Prior to the examination, provide the examinee with a copy of this subchapter and a copy of all questions to be asked during the examination, which may be retained by the examinee. This does not preclude follow-up questions as long as the examiner gives the examinee a copy of the questions.

Inform the examinee as follows:

the examinee has the right to accept or refuse the examination;

the examinee has the right to halt an examination in progress at any time;

the examinee is not required to answer any questions or give any information;

any information the examinee volunteers could be used against the examinee, or made available to the employer, unless otherwise specified and agreed to in writing by the examinee; and

provide the examinee with a copy of the examination results and all reports or analyses done by the examiner which are shared with the employer.

During a polygraph examination, an examinee shall not be asked:

any questions regarding the examinee’s political, religious, or labor union affiliations;

questions regarding the examinee’s sexual practices, social habits, or his or her marital relationship, unless the questions clearly relate to job performance;

questions which are unrelated to job performance.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 89

.

§ 494d.
Employee rights in related proceedings.

No employee shall be discharged, disciplined or discriminated against in any manner for filing a complaint or testifying in any proceeding or action involving violations of the provisions of this subchapter.
An employee discriminated against in violation of the provisions of this section shall be compensated by his or her employer the amount of any loss of wages and benefits arising out of such discrimination and shall be restored to his or her previous position of employment.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 89

.

§ 494e.
Penalties.

Any individual violating any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be fined not less than $500.00 nor more than $1,000.00 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both, and the penalty shall not be suspended.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 89

.